Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1705
Time-share program; discriminatory ordinance or regulation; prohibited.

A zoning, subdivision, or other ordinance or regulation shall not discriminate against the creation of time-share intervals or impose any requirement upon a time-share program which it would not impose upon a similar development under a different form of ownership.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 5.